Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1422
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 85-1421 to 85-1427:

(1) Commission shall mean the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education; and

(2) Information system shall mean the uniform information system established by such sections and known as the Nebraska Educational Data System.

Laws 1978, LB 897, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 106;

Laws 1992, LB 988, § 18;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 85-969;

Laws 1994, LB 683, § 26.